apertium-mos.mos.dix
	<pardef n="zãgsg/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zak kʋle/nga__n">
			<e>       <p><l>nga</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ng</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>ngã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>mse</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>mse</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e>       <p><l>msã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e r="LR"><p><l>msã</l>       <r>nga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="zak tʋʋm/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zamaan/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
		<pardef n="zãmaan/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zamaan-paal/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- verbe -->
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãmbd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãmb/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãmsd/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>b</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ba</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>bã</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãmsd/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãmsg/o__n">
		<e>       <p><l></l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãngoe/oogo__n">
		<e>       <p><l>oog </l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oogo </l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oogo </l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>oogã</l>        <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>to</l>         <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>tã</l>         <r>oogo<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãn/de__n">
		<e>       <p><l>d</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dã</l>        <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l></l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>      <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zãngoee/re__n">
		<e>       <p><l>re</l>    <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>r</l>    <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>    <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zaal/em__n">
		<e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>emã</l>       <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ã</l>         <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zak soab/a__n">
		<e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ã</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dbãmba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>dbãmba</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>dbãmbã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>dbãmbã</l>    <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="zaood/ga__n">
		<e>       <p><l>g</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
		<e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>gã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>se</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e>       <p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e r="LR"><p><l>sã</l>        <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="zaalem">          <i>zaal</i><par n="zaal/em__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãgsgo">          <i>zãgsg</i><par n="zãgsg/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zak kʋlenga">     <i>zak kʋle</i><par n="zak kʋle/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zak soaba">       <i>zak soab</i><par n="zak soab/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zak tʋʋmde">      <i>zak tʋʋm</i><par n="zak tʋʋm/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zamaande">        <i>zamaan</i><par n="zamaan/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmaande">        <i>zãmaan</i><par n="zãmaan/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zamaan-paalga">   <i>zamaan-paal</i><par n="zamaan-paal/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmbda">          <i>zãmbd</i><par n="zãmbd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmbo">           <i>zãmb</i><par n="zãmb/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmsda">          <i>zãmsd</i><par n="zãmsd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmsdo">          <i>zãmsd</i><par n="zãmsd/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmsgo">          <i>zãmsg</i><par n="zãmsg/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãnde">           <i>zãn</i><par n="zãn/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãngoeoogo">      <i>zãngoe</i><par n="zãngoe/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãngoeere">       <i>zãngoee</i><par n="zãngoee/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zaoodga">         <i>zaood</i><par n="zaood/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zaalem">          <i>zaal</i><par n="zaal/em__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãgsgo">          <i>zãgsg</i><par n="zãgsg/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zak kʋlenga">     <i>zak kʋle</i><par n="zak kʋle/nga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zak soaba">       <i>zak soab</i><par n="zak soab/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zak tʋʋmde">      <i>zak tʋʋm</i><par n="zak tʋʋm/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zamaande">        <i>zamaan</i><par n="zamaan/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmaande">        <i>zãmaan</i><par n="zãmaan/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zamaan-paalga">   <i>zamaan-paal</i><par n="zamaan-paal/ga__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmbda">          <i>zãmbd</i><par n="zãmbd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmbo">           <i>zãmb</i><par n="zãmb/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmsda">          <i>zãmsd</i><par n="zãmsd/a__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmsdo">          <i>zãmsd</i><par n="zãmsd/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãmsgo">          <i>zãmsg</i><par n="zãmsg/o__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãnde">           <i>zãn</i><par n="zãn/de__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãngoeoogo">      <i>zãngoe</i><par n="zãngoe/oogo__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zãngoeere">       <i>zãngoee</i><par n="zãngoee/re__n"/></e>
	<e lm="zaoodga">         <i>zaood</i><par n="zaood/ga__n"/></e>
